Washington statutes.
RCW 15.100.043

Costs of proceeding to form a commission—Reimbursement.

The association responsible for giving the director notice under RCW 15.100.040 that substantial interest exists in forming a forest products commission shall reimburse the department for its costs associated with conducting a proceeding to initiate a commission under RCW 15.100.040 and 15.100.120. If the necessary approval is received for the creation of a commission, the commission shall reimburse the association for the costs paid to the department when funds become available.

[ 2002 c 251 s 4.]